Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

42-7-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Motor Vehicle Financial Responsibility Act".

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2473, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly is acutely aware of the toll in human suffering and loss of life, limb, and property caused by negligence in the operation of motor vehicles in our state. Although it recognizes that this basic problem can be and is being dealt with by direct measures designed to protect our people from the ravages of irresponsible drivers, the general assembly is also very much concerned with the financial loss visited upon innocent traffic accident victims by negligent motorists who are financially irresponsible. In prescribing the sanctions and requirements of this article, it is the policy of this state to induce and encourage all motorists to provide for their financial responsibility for the protection of others, and to assure the widespread availability to the insuring public of insurance protection against financial loss caused by negligent financially irresponsible motorists.

The general assembly hereby finds that motor vehicle accidents cause a substantial economic impact in lost wages, medical bills, and property destruction exacerbated by the following:

Some negligent motorists are uninsured or flee the scene of an accident.

Negligent motorists often attempt to avoid financial responsibility by means such as fleeing the state, concealing their whereabouts, or failing to update the address on their driver's license with the department of revenue, thereby frustrating service of process and preventing the innocent victim from accessing either the negligent driver's liability insurance policy or the uninsured motorist coverage the victim has purchased.

When innocent traffic accident victims cannot access either the negligent driver's automobile liability policy or their own uninsured motorist coverage, the burden of the uncompensated losses are borne by the taxpayer in the form of taxes for medicaid, by trauma facilities in the form of uncompensated hospital-related costs, and by the innocent victim.

The state of Colorado encourages the widespread availability of uninsured or underinsured motorist insurance by requiring every motor vehicle liability policy delivered or issued in this state to contain uninsured motorist coverage unless the named insured rejects such coverage in writing.

Because insurance benefits have been paid for by either the negligent driver or the innocent victim for the purpose of compensating the innocent victim for injuries or losses, the general assembly declares that it is necessary to simplify the process for an innocent victim to access the negligent driver's liability insurance policy or his or her own uninsured motorist coverage in order to prevent the burden from being borne by the taxpayer or the health care system.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that the policy of Colorado is that all motor vehicle liability policies shall require policyholders of an automobile liability policy to appoint their insurance carrier as an agent for the purpose of service of process in certain limited instances in accordance with section 42-7-414 (3), and to deem a defendant to be uninsured for purposes of uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage if the court deems service on the defendant's insurance company to be ineffective or insufficient.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2473, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1164), ch. 196, p. 846, § 2, effective January 1, 2011.

42-7-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Accident" means a motor vehicle accident occurring on public or private property within this state.

"Automobile liability policy" or "bond" means a liability policy or bond subject, if the accident has resulted in bodily injury or death, to a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to said limit for one person, to a limit of not less than fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and, if the accident has resulted in injury to or destruction of property, to a limit of not less than fifteen thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.

"Conviction" means conviction in any court of record or municipal court, and such conviction shall include a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court, the forfeiture of any bail or collateral deposited to secure a defendant's appearance in court which forfeiture has not been vacated, and the acceptance and payment of a penalty assessment under the provisions of section 42-4-1701 or under the similar provisions of any town or city ordinance.

"Department" means the department of revenue acting directly or through its duly authorized officers and agents.

"Director" means the executive director of the department of revenue.

"Driver" means every person who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle upon a highway.

(6.5) (a) "Evidence of insurance" means proof given by the insured in person to the department that the insured has a complying policy in full force and effect. Proof may be made through presentation of a copy of such complying policy or a card issued to the insured as evidence that a complying policy is in full force and effect. A card issued to the insured as evidence that a complying policy is in full force and effect may be produced in either paper or electronic format. Acceptable electronic formats include display of electronic images on a cellular phone or any other type of portable electronic device.

For purposes of this subsection (6.5), "complying policy" means a policy of insurance as required by part 6 of article 4 of title 10, C.R.S.

"License" means any license, temporary instruction permit, or temporary license issued under laws of this state pertaining to the licensing of persons to operate motor vehicles, or, with respect to any person not licensed, the term means any operating privilege or privileges to apply for such license.

"Motor vehicle" means a vehicle that is self-propelled, including trailers and semitrailers designed for use with such vehicles and every vehicle that is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires but not operated upon rails.

"Motor vehicle" does not include an electric scooter, as defined in section 42-1-102.

"Motor vehicle liability policy", "operators' policy of liability insurance", or "financial responsibility bond" means a policy or bond certified as proof of financial responsibility for the future.

"Nonresident" means every person who is not a resident of this state.

"Nonresident's operating privilege" means the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the operation by the nonresident of a motor vehicle.

"Owner" means a person who holds the legal title of the vehicle; or in the event a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, or in the event a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner for the purpose of this article.

"Person" means every natural person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation.

"Proof of financial responsibility for the future", also referred to in this article as proof of financial responsibility, means proof of ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring after the effective date of said proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, and, subject to said limit for one person, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.

For purposes of this title, the form known as the "SR-22" furnished to the department may be used as proof of financial responsibility in compliance with this article.

"State" means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any province of Canada.

"Transportation contract" means a contract, agreement, or understanding, whether written or oral, express or implied, between a motor carrier and another party regarding:

The transportation of property by motor vehicle for compensation or hire;

Entrance on property for the purpose of loading, unloading, or transporting property by motor vehicle for compensation or hire; or

Access or services incidental or related to an activity described in subparagraph (I) or (II) of this paragraph (a).

"Transportation contract" does not include:

A contract, subcontract, or agreement that concerns or affects transportation involving a railroad;

The uniform intermodal interchange and facilities access agreement administered by the intermodal association of North America; or

Any other agreement providing for the interchange, use, or possession of an intermodal chassis or container or other intermodal equipment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2473, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(6.5) added and (14) amended, p. 708, § 3, effective May 23; (6.5) amended, p. 1215, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(6.5)(b) amended, p. 794, § 4, effective May 21.

L. 2013:

(6.5)(a) amended, (HB 13-1159), ch. 101, p. 322, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(16) added, (HB 14-1065), ch. 63, p. 283, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 2019:

IP and (8) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2565, § 17, effective May 23.